District of Columbia statutes.
33-301

Repealed

Composition or compromise of partner with creditors on dissolution — Effect on discharge.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1414, ch. 854, § 1494
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(9), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-301.
1973 Ed., § 41-201.
Applicability date of D.C. Law 18-378: Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-378, as amended by section 7082 of D.C. Law 19-21, provided: “Sec. 5. Applicability. This act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.”.